Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Chapter 1. Money of Account

§ 1.
Dollar, cent, and mill.

The money of account in the State shall be the dollar, cent, and mill; and accounts in public offices and proceedings in court shall be in conformity herewith; but this section shall not affect an account, charge, or entry originally made or a contract expressed in other money of account, but the same shall be reduced to dollars and parts of a dollar in an action thereon.